District of Columbia statutes.
7-1208.03

Authority of the Commission on Mental Health.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to the operations of the Commission on Mental Health.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-136, § 803, 25 DCR 5055

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2073.
1973 Ed., § 6-1645.